Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-932.01
Foundations education, defined.

Foundations education shall mean education which includes remedial and developmental programs, adult basic education, general education development, English as a second language, compensatory education, and refresher courses.

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 9.